Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.3892, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition. (a) A person must not import, manufacture, sell, hold for sale, or distribute or offer for use in this state any covered product containing: (1) lead at more than 0.009 percent by total weight (90 parts per million); or (2) cadmium at more than 0.0075 percent by total weight (75 parts per million). (b) This section does not apply to covered products containing lead or cadmium, or both, when regulation is preempted by federal law. new text begin (c) Until January 1, 2028, this section does not apply to a product containing an internal circuit board with lead solder. new text end new text begin (d) A manufacturer of a key fob exempted under paragraph (c) must submit a report every six months to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency that details the: new text end new text begin (1) barriers to complying with the prohibition under this subdivision; new text end new text begin (2) progress made toward achieving compliance; and new text end new text begin (3) most recent timeline for achieving compliance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end